District of Columbia statutes.
26-109

Applicability of provisions on federal reserve banks to nonmember banks.

All acts prohibited by the provisions of § 501 of Title 12 and §§ 334, 656, 1004, and 1005 of Title 18, United States Code, as amended, and §§ 375, 375a, 376, and 503 of Title 12, and §§ 212, 213, 214, 215, 655, 1005, 1014, 1906, and 1909 of Title 18, United States Code, as amended, in the case of federal reserve banks or member banks thereof, or of directors, officers, or employees of such banks, are likewise prohibited, respectively, in the case of banks in the District of Columbia which are not members of a federal reserve bank, or of directors, officers, or employees of such banks, and shall be punishable by the respective penalties provided in such section; provided, that the District of Columbia Regional Interstate Banking Act of 1985 Amendments Act of 1985 [D.C. Law 6-107] shall apply to banks which are not national banks.

History

Mar. 4, 1933, 47 Stat. 1568, ch. 274, § 8
Nov. 23, 1985, D.C. Law 6-63, § 106(c)(3)
as added Apr. 11, 1986, D.C. Law 6-107, § 2(k), 33 DCR 1168

Section References

This section is referenced in § 26-710.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-109.
1973 Ed., § 26-109.

References in Text

The “District of Columbia Regional Interstate Banking Act of 1985 Amendments Act of 1985,” referred to in the proviso, is D.C. Law 6-107.